New York, session 2025-2026, S620.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 7209 of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 62 of the laws of 1989, is amended and a new subdivi- 3 sion 10 is added to read as follows: 4 6. It shall be lawful for a corporation organized and existing under 5 the laws of the state of New York which on the fifteenth day of April, 6 nineteen hundred thirty-five and continuously thereafter, was lawfully 7 practicing engineering or land surveying in New York state, to continue 8 such practice provided that the chief executive officer shall be a 9 professional engineer licensed under this article, if practicing engi- 10 neering, or a land surveyor licensed under this article, if practicing 11 land surveying, and provided further that the person or persons carrying 12 on the actual practice of engineering or surveying on behalf of, or 13 designated as "engineer" or "surveyor", with or without qualifying or 14 characterizing word, by such corporation shall be authorized to practice EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01545-10-6 S. 620--C 2 1 engineering or land surveying as provided in this article. Such corpo- 2 ration shall also be authorized to practice geology provided that such 3 corporation's corporate purposes include the practice of professional 4 geology pursuant to subdivision ten of this section. It shall be lawful 5 for a corporation which, on account of or as a result of requirements, 6 restrictions or provisions of federal law, was organized subsequent to 7 April fifteenth, nineteen hundred thirty-five for the purpose of taking 8 over an existing engineering organization established prior to such time 9 and which has taken over such organization and continued its engineering 10 activities, provided that the chief executive officer of such corpo- 11 ration shall be a professional engineer licensed under this article and 12 provided further, that the person or persons carrying on the actual 13 practice of engineering on behalf of, or designated as "engineer", with 14 or without qualifying or characterizing word, by such corporation, shall 15 be authorized to practice engineering as provided in this article. No 16 such corporation shall change its name or sell its franchise or transfer 17 its corporate rights, directly or indirectly to any person, firm or 18 corporation without the consent of the department. Each such corporation 19 shall obtain a triennial registration on payment of a fee of fifty 20 dollars. 21 10. Prior to December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-nine, the 22 department and the department of state shall allow a business corpo- 23 ration as described in subdivision six of this section to amend its 24 certificate of incorporation so that its corporate purposes include the 25 practice of professional geology. The certificate of amendment shall 26 have attached thereto a certificate or certificates issued by the 27 licensing authority certifying that at least one director or officer of 28 the business corporation is a professional geologist licensed under this 29 article. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, such 30 business corporation shall be required to comply with all applicable 31 laws, rules, or regulations relating to the practice of professional 32 geology under this title. 33 § 2. Subdivisions 2 and 3 of section 7210 of the education law, as 34 amended by chapter 483 of the laws of 2001, are amended to read as 35 follows: 36 2. Upon application a certificate of authorization shall be issued by 37 the department to all individuals, corporations, limited liability 38 companies, limited liability partnerships, partnerships and joint enter- 39 prises specified in subdivision one of this section and which are 40 authorized to provide professional engineering [or], land surveying or 41 professional geology services and pay the appropriate fee. 42 3. A "certificate of authorization" shall authorize such individual, 43 corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, 44 partnership or joint enterprise to provide professional engineering 45 [or], land surveying or professional geology services for three years 46 from the date of issuance subject to, as otherwise prescribed by law, 47 the supervision of the regents of the university of the state of New 48 York including the power to discipline and impose penalties in the same 49 manner and to the same extent as is provided with respect to individuals 50 and their licenses and registration pursuant to this title. 51 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 52 it shall have become a law.